Utah statutes.
53B-17-303.   Use of unclaimed dead bodies for promotion of science.
(1)  A body unclaimed after 60 days under Section  53B-17-301 may be used for
the following purposes:
(a)  to promote medical and surgical science; and
(b)  for instruction and study by physicians and students of anatomy and
embalming.
(2)  Once these purposes are accomplished, the remains are properly cremated
or receive a decent burial.
